Washington statutes.
RCW 21.40.030

Disclosure of whistleblower identity.

Any individual who anonymously makes a claim must be represented by counsel. Prior to the payment of an award, a whistleblower shall disclose their identity and provide such other information as the securities division may require, directly or through counsel, for the whistleblower.

[ 2023 c 149 s 4.]